Utah statutes.
10-7-65.   Party plaintiff -- Successive actions permitted.
All actions brought to recover any fine or to enforce any penalty under an
ordinance of a city or town shall be brought in the corporate name of the city
or town as plaintiff.  No prosecution, recovery, or acquittal for the
violation of any such ordinance shall constitute a defense to any other
prosecution of the same person for any other violation of any such ordinance
although the different causes of action existed at the same time and if united
would not have exceeded the jurisdiction of a justice court judge.
